Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-4517
Compliance with act.

Any policy or rider advertised, marketed, or offered as long-term care insurance or nursing home insurance shall comply with the Long-Term Care Insurance Act.

Laws 1987, LB 416, § 17;

Laws 1992, LB 1006, § 50.